Oklahoma, session 2025, SB806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Food is
Medicine Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5009.7 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall seek any necessary
federal approval to provide coverage for nutrition supports under
the state Medicaid program for the purpose of implementing Food is
Medicine programs as provided by this section.
B. Food is Medicine programs shall be designed to improve
health outcomes for Medicaid members with nutrition-related chronic
diseases through nutrition services and to reduce the need for
medical care.
C. Nutrition services covered under the state Medicaid program
may include, but are not limited to:
1. Case management;
2. Nutrition counseling;
3. Meals or pantry stocking;
4. Nutrition prescriptions; and
5. Grocery provisions.
D. Wherever feasible, the Authority and contracted entities
under the state Medicaid program shall prioritize the inclusion of
community-based organizations and local growers to support the
purchase of locally grown food in nutrition prescriptions.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-147.2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The State Department of Education shall provide, to schools who
apply for grants under the Oklahoma Farm to School Program Act
codified at Section 5-60.1 et seq. of Title 2 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, technical assistance with applying for grants and
administering programs that expand student access to fresh, healthy
food.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 806 Page 2

SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 806 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 806 Page 4